Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1396XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1396XD (3) 91
jda/jh

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 256.210, subsection 2, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
2. a. Scholarship Subject to paragraph “b”, scholarship
awards paid pursuant to this section shall not exceed the
resident tuition rate established for institutions of higher
learning under the control of the state board of regents.
If the amount appropriated in a fiscal year for purposes of
this section is insufficient to provide scholarships to all
national guard members who apply for the program and who are
determined by the adjutant general to be eligible for the
program, the adjutant general shall, in coordination with
the commission, determine the distribution of scholarships.
However, scholarship awards paid pursuant to this section and
shall not be less than fifty percent of the resident tuition
rate established for institutions of higher learning under
the control of the state board of regents or fifty percent of
the tuition rate at the institution attended by the national
guard member, whichever is lower. Neither eligibility nor
scholarship award determinations shall be based upon a national
guard member’s unit, the location at which drills are attended,
or whether the eligible individual is a member of the Iowa army
or air national guard.
b. Scholarship awards paid pursuant to this section shall
not exceed the difference between the tuition rate at the
institution attended by the national guard member less any
financial aid the national guard member receives under 10
U.S.C. §2007.
c. If the amount appropriated in a fiscal year for purposes
of this section is insufficient to provide scholarships to
all national guard members who apply for the program and who
are determined by the adjutant general to be eligible for the
program, the adjutant general shall, in coordination with the
commission, determine the distribution of scholarships.